en: shrimp, prawn
ak: Monko
bn: চিংড়ি
br: Chevrenn
ca: gamba
cs: krevety
da: Reje, rejer
de: Garnele, Garnelen, Crevetten, Crevette
eo: salikoko
es: gamba, langostino, gambon
eu: Izkira
fa: میگو
fi: katkarapu, katkaravut
fo: Rækja
fr: crevette, crevettes
gl: Gamba
he: שרימפ
hr: kozica, kozice, pacifička kozica
hu: garnéla
id: Udang
ja: エビ, えび
ko: 새우
la: Squilla
mk: ракчиња
nl: garnaal, garnalen
oc: Cambaròta
pl: Krewetka, krewetki, krewetek, krewetkowy, krewetkowa, krewetkowe
pt: camarão
ro: crevete, creveți
ru: креветки
sv: räkor
sw: Uduvi
th: กุ้งฝอย
tr: Karides
vi: Tôm
wa: Gurnåte
za: Gungq
zh: 虾

en: red prawn
de: Blassrote Tiefseegarnele, Gamba Roja
es: gamba roja
hr: crvena kozica
it: gambero rosso

en: shrimp paste
de: Garnelenpaste
fi: katkaraputahna
fr: pâte de crevettes
hr: pasta od kozica
it: pasta di gamberi
ja: 海老ペスト
nn: rekepasta
pl: pasta krewetkowa
sv: räkpasta

en: shrimp powder
de: Garnelenpulver
fr: poudre de crevette
hr: škampi u prahu
it: polvere di gamberetti
ja: エビパウダー
nl: garnalenpoeder
sv: räkpulver

en: pink shrimps, pink schrimp
fr: crevette rose, crevettes roses
it: gamberetti rosa

en: Penaeidae, penaeid shrimp
ar: بنيدات
bg: Бели скариди
ca: Peneid
de: Shrimps (Penaeidae), Garnelen (Penaeidae), Penaeidae
fa: درازمنقارچگان
fi: valkokatkaravut
fr: Penaeidae, Penaeid shrimp
gl: Peneidos
hr: penaeidae
it: penaeidae
ja: クルマエビ科
ko: 보리새우과
la: Penaeidae, Penaeus spp
mk: пенеиди
vi: Họ Tôm he
zh: 對蝦科

en: deep-sea shrimp, gamba prawns, gamba shrimps
bg: Скарида Аристид
ca: Aristeid
de: Gambas, Riesengarnelen
fr: gamba, gambas
gl: Aristeidos
hr: dubokomorski škampi
la: Aristeidae

en: scarlet shrimp, Plesiopenaeus Edwardsianus
de: Plesiopenaeus Edwardsianus, Carabineros
es: carabinero, Plesiopenaeus Edwardsianus
hr: grimizni škampi
it: gamberetti scarlatti
la: Plesiopenaeus Edwardsianus

en: giant tiger prawn, Asian tiger shrimp, Penaeus monodon
bg: гигантска тигрова скарида, Penaeus monodon
de: Riesen Tigergarnele, Penaeus monodon
fa: میگوی ببری بزرگ, Penaeus monodon
fi: tiikerikatkarapu, Penaeus monodon
fr: Crevette géante tigrée, crevettes tropicale, Crevettes géantes tigrées, crevettes tropicales tigrées, Penaeus monodon
hr: divovska tigrasta kozica
id: Udang windu, Penaeus monodon
it: gambero tigre gigante
ja: ウシエビ, Penaeus monodon
ko: 블랙타이거, Penaeus monodon
la: Penaeus monodon
ms: Udang harimau, Penaeus monodon
pl: krewetka tygrysia, Penaeus monodon, krewetki tygrysie
pt: Camarão-tigre-gigante, Penaeus monodon
th: กุ้งกุลาดำ, Penaeus monodon
tr: Jumbo karides, Penaeus monodon
vi: Tôm sú, Penaeus monodon
zh: 草蝦, Penaeus monodon

en: mantis shrimp
de: Heuschreckenkrebs, Stomatopoda
es: galera
hr: bogomoljka škampi
it: gamberetto mantide
la: Stomatopoda
th: กั้ง

en: whiteleg shrimp, Litopenaeus vannamei
de: Weißbeingarnele, Litopenaeus vannamei
es: camarón, Litopenaeus vannamei
fi: valkokatkarapu, Litopenaeus vannamei
fr: Crevette à pattes blanches, Litopenaeus vannamei
hr: kozica pacifička, penaeus vannamei
it: gamberetti bianchi
la: Litopenaeus vannamei, Penaeus vannamei, Litopenaus vanamei
nl: witpootgarnaal
pl: krewetka białonoga, Litopenaeus vannamei, krewetki białe, krewetka biała
pt: camarão-de-patas-brancas, Litopenaeus vannamei
sl: bele kozice

en: Heterocarpus
de: Tiefseegarnelen, Heterocarpus
fr: Heterocarpus
hr: heterokarpus
it: heterocarpus
la: Heterocarpus, Heterocarpus spp

en: grey shrimp, Crangon crangon
ar: روبيان أوروبي, Crangon crangon
bg: обикновена:ребна скарид, Crangon crangon
br: Chevr-traezh, Crangon crangon
da: Hestereje, Crangon crangon
de: Nordseegarnele, Crangon crangon
eu: Izkira zuri, Crangon crangon
fa: میگوی قهوه‌ای, Crangon crangon
fi: Hietakatkarapu, Crangon crangon
fr: crevette grise, crevettes grises, Crevette grise européenne, Crangon crangon
ga: Ribe róibéis, Crangon crangon
hr: sivi škampi
io: Kreveto, Crangon crangon
it: Gamberetto grigio, Crangon crangon
ja: ヨーロッパエビジャコ, Crangon crangon
kk: Креветка, Crangon crangon
la: Crangon crangon
nb: Sandreke, Crangon crangon
nl: grijze garnalen, Noordzeegarnaal, Crangon crangon
sl: Navadna peščena kozica, Crangon crangon
sv: Sandräka, Crangon crangon
uk: Шримс звичайний, Crangon crangon

en: northern prawn, Pandalus borealis
bg: северна скарида, Pandalus borealis
ca: gamba boreal, Pandalus borealis
cs: krevetka severní, Pandalus borealis
da: Dybvandsreje, Pandalus borealis
de: Kanada-Crevetten, Eismeergarnele, Pandalus borealis
es: camarón boreal, camarón nórdico
fi: Pohjankatkarapu, Pandalus borealis
fr: crevettes nordique, Crevette nordique du Canada, Pandalus borealis
gl: Camarón ártico, Pandalus borealis
hr: sjeverna kozica
hu: Norvég garnéla, Pandalus borealis
is: Stóri kampalampi, Pandalus borealis
it: Gamberetti del Canada, Pandalus borealis
ja: ホッコクアカエビ, Pandalus borealis
la: Pandalus borealis
lt: Paprastoji šiaurinė krevetė, Pandalus borealis
nb: dypvannsreke, Pandalus borealis
pl: krewetka północna, Pandalus borealis
ro: Pandalus borealis
sv: Nordhavsräka, Pandalus borealis
vi: Tôm hồng, Pandalus borealis
zh: 北极虾, Pandalus borealis

en: rainbow shrimp, Parapenaeopsis sculptilis
de: Parapenaeopsis sculptilis
fr: Crevette arc-en-ciel, Parapenaeopsis sculptilis
hr: duginih račića
it: gamberetti arcobaleno
la: Parapenaeopsis sculptilis, Parapenaeopsis, Parapenaeopsis spp

en: parapenaeopsis stylifera
xx: parapenaeopsis stylifera
de: Parapenaeopsis Stylifera

en: pandalus jordani
xx: pandalus jordani
ar: نوع من القشريات
de: Pandalus Jordani
is: bleikrækja

en: psyllium, plantago, psyllium fibre, psyllium husk, psyllium seed husk
ar: بزر قطونة
cs: psyllium
da: psyllium, psyllium skræl
de: Psyllium, Flohsamenschalen, Plantago Psyllium
es: Psilio, plantago, cáscara de semilla de psyllium
fa: بارهنگ کتانی
fi: psyllium, psylliumkuitu, psylliuminsiemenkuori
fr: fibres de psyllium, psyllium, enveloppe de psyllium, enveloppes de psyllium
he: פסיליום
hi: isabgol
hr: psyllium, vlakna psylliuma
it: psyllium, fibra di psillio
nl: Psyllium, psylliumvezels, psylliumvezel, vlozaadvezels
pl: Babka, łuski płesznika, błonnik psylium, babka płesznik, babki płesznik, błonnik z babki płesznik, łupiny nasienne babki płesznik, łuski psyllium - łuski nasion babki jajowatej
ro: Psyllium
ru: Подорожник
sd: اسپنگر
sv: psylliumfiber, psylliumfröskal, psyllium
ta: Isabgol
uk: Подорожник
ur: اسپغول

en: psyllium seed
da: loppefrø
sv: loppfrö, psylliumfrö, psylliumfrön

en: blond psyllium
es: psyllium rubio
fr: psyllium blond
hr: plavokosi psilium
it: psillio biondo
la: Plantago ovata
pl: babka jajowata, babki jajowatej